Mississippi, session 2026, HB4163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Hillary Ivy of Neshoba County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for False Pretenses in Clarke County, Mississippi.  On December 14, 2016, she was sentenced to serve five (5) years probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. On January 24, 2022, she was released from probation.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.